Utah statutes.
63B-11-702.   Other capital facility authorizations and intent language.
(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  Salt Lake Community College use donations and other institutional funds
to plan, design, and construct a renovation of and addition to the Grand
Theater under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the college may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the
extent that the college is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that
the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the University of Utah use donations, grants, and other institutional
funds to plan, design, and construct a Department of Chemistry Gauss House
under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction
and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to
the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents
that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the University of Utah use donations and other institutional funds to
plan, design, and construct an expansion of the Eccles Health Science Library
and the associated parking structure under the direction of the director of
the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to
the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents
that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the University of Utah use donations and other institutional funds to
plan, design, and construct a Phase II Addition to the Moran Eye Center under
the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may not request state funds for operations and
maintenance.
(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the University of Utah use donations and other institutional funds to
plan, design, and construct a Children's Dance Theatre under the direction of
the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may not request state funds for operations and
maintenance.
(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  Utah State University use donations and other institutional funds to
plan, design, and construct a Teaching Pavilion at its Animal Science Farm
under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction
and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to
the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents
that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of
Regents policy R710.
(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Division of Juvenile Justice Services use donations to plan, design,
and construct a chapel at the Slate Canyon Youth Corrections Facility under
the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the division may not request additional state funding for operations and
maintenance.
(8)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Utah National Guard use
federal funds and proceeds from the sale of property to acquire a site for new
facilities in Salt Lake or Davis County.
(9)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Utah National Guard use donations and grants to plan, design, and
construct the renovation and expansion of the Fort Douglas Military Museum
under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction
and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;
(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and
(c)  the National Guard may not request additional state funding for
operations and maintenance.
(10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management pursue the
exchange of public safety facilities in Orem if:
(i)  the land and newly constructed replacement facilities meet the needs of
the Driver License Division and the Utah Highway Patrol; and
(ii)  the replacement property and facilities can be obtained at a cost that
is not less than the market value of the existing property and facilities; and
(b)  the division confirms the value of the properties to be exchanged.
